Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB609.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7102 of Title 68 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 7102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this part which are applicable to specific provisions of this part, the following words and phrases when used in this part shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Builder." A person lawfully performing or furnishing the 123456789101112131415161718 design, planning, supervision or observation of construction or construction of an improvement to real property.* * *"Construction defect." A material defect that results from a deficiency in the design, planning, supervision or observation of construction or construction of an improvement to real property. The term includes a material defect that results from the use of defective building materials or from the improper installation of building materials.* * *Section 2. Section 7302 of Title 68 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 7302. Application of chapter.* * *(a.1) Application of disclosure of construction defects.--Section 7303.1 (relating to disclosure of construction defects) shall apply only to residential real property.* * *Section 3. Title 68 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 7303.1. Disclosure of construction defects.(a) Notification.--If a builder becomes aware of a construction defect in an improvement to real property constructed or facilitated by the builder, the builder shall notify the owner of the real property. The builder shall also notify the owner of any real property for which the builder constructed or facilitated construction of an improvement if the builder has reasonable cause to suspect the existence of a substantially similar construction defect. The following shall apply:(1) The notification shall include all of the following:20250HB0609PN0622 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) A description of the construction defect or suspected construction defect.(ii) The reason that the builder knows or suspects that the construction defect exists.(iii) Contact information for the builder.(2) The notification shall be made within 30 days after the builder knows or has reasonable cause to suspect that the construction defect exists.(3) The builder shall provide the notification by certified mail to the address of record for the owner of the real property.(4) The notification is not required if at least 15 years have elapsed since completion of construction of the defective improvement.(5) The notification shall not constitute evidence of the builder's liability for the construction defect, nor shall the notification relieve the builder from any liability which may exist as the result of the construction defect.(b) Failure to comply.--A builder who willfully or negligently fails to notify an owner of real property as required by this section shall be liable for the amount of actual damages suffered by the owner as a result of the builder's failure to notify the owner. This subsection shall not be construed to restrict or expand the authority of a court to impose punitive damages or apply other remedies applicable under another provision of law.(c) Statute of limitations.--An action for damages as the result of a violation of this section must be commenced within two years of the time that the owner of the real property becomes aware of the builder's failure to comply with this 20250HB0609PN0622 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0609PN0622 - 4 - 12